District of Columbia statutes.
20-301

Scope.

This chapter applies to the opening of an estate which begins with the filing of a petition for probate by an interested person as provided in section 20-304 and results in the probate of a will or the determination of a decedent’s intestacy and the appointment of a personal representative. Probate may occur either:

(a)

As an abbreviated probate proceeding as provided in subchapter II of this chapter;

(b)

As a standard probate proceeding as provided in subchapter III of this chapter;

(c)

As a small estates proceeding as provided in subchapter VI of this chapter.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-301.